test/src/gt-desc-yamls/adj-baaadtsoeh_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
 
  Adjective - båadtsoeh: # 
    båadtsoeh+v1+A+Attr: båadtsoeh
    båadtsoeh+v2+A+Attr: båadtsah
    båadtsoeh+v3+A+Attr: båadtjah
    

  Adjective - feejjene: # 
    feejjene+A+Attr: feejjene 
    feejjene+Adv: feejjene

  Adjective - læhkoeladtje: # 
    læhkoeladtje+v1+A+Attr: læhkoeladtje
    læhkoeladtje+v2+A+Attr: lahkoeladtje
    læhkoeladtje+v1+A+Sg+Nom: læhkoeladtje
    læhkoeladtje+v2+A+Sg+Nom: lahkoeladtje

  Adjective - rudtjege: # 
    rudtjege+A+Attr: [rudtje, rudtjege] 
    rudtjege+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [rudtjegabpa, rudtjebe, rudtjegåbpoe]
    rudtjege+A+Sg+Nom: [rudtje, rudtjege, rudtjehke] 
    rudtjege+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [rudtjegommes, rudtjemes, rudtjegammes]

  Adjective - rudtjege: # 
    rudtjege+A+Err/Orth+Attr: rudtjehke 
    rudtjege+A+Err/Orth+Der/Comp+A+Attr: [rudtjehkåbpoe, rudtjehkabpa]
    rudtjege+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: rudtjehke 
    rudtjege+A+Err/Orth+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [rudtjehkommes, rudtjehkammes]

  
